test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-cuhca_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


# á stems

  Noun - čuhčá: # á-stems
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Nom: čuhčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Gen: čuuvčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Acc: čuuvčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Ill: čuuhčán
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Loc: čuuvčást
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Com: čuvččáin
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Abe: čuˊvčáttáá
    čuhčá+N+Ess: čuhčán
    čuhčá+N+Par: čuhčád
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Nom: [čuuvčáh, čuˊvčáh]
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Gen: čuuvčái, čuˊvčái]
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Acc: čuuvčáid
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Ill: čuvččáid
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Loc: čuuvčáin
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Com: čuˊvčáiguin
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Abe: čuˊvčáittáá
    
